Rhode Island statutes. Title 37 Public Property and Works
Chapter 15.1 Hard-To-Dispose Material — Control and Recycling

37-15.1-1.
Statement of policy.

Recognizing the ever increasing use of hard-to-dispose material by the people of Rhode Island as well as the fundamental need for a healthful, clean, and beautiful environment; and further recognizing that the proliferation and accumulation of hard-to-dispose material throughout this state impairs this need and constitutes a public health hazard; and further recognizing the need to conserve energy and natural resources; and further recognizing that there is an imperative need to anticipate, plan for, and accomplish effective control, recovery, and recycling of hard-to-dispose material, there is hereby enacted this “hard-to-dispose material control and recycling” chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 514, § 1.

37-15.1-2.
Declaration of purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to establish programs to aid in the monitoring, tracking, reuse, recycling, and proper disposal of hard-to-dispose materials and to respond to clean-up activities associated with hard-to-dispose material by delegating to the department of environmental management the authority to:

Conduct a permanent and continuous program to control and remove hard-to-dispose materials generated within the state to the maximum practical extent possible;

Recover and recycle waste materials related to hard-to-dispose material;

Encourage waste reduction, recovery, and private recycling;

Increase public awareness of the need for recycling; and

To aid in the development of private and public sector facilities and programs for the monitoring, tracking, recycling, reuse, reduction, and proper disposal of hard-to-dispose material.

It is further the intent and purpose of this chapter to create jobs for employment in hard-to-dispose material cleanup and related activities and to encourage small, private recycling centers. This program shall include the compatible goal of recovery of recyclable material to conserve energy and natural resources wherever practicable. Every department of state government and all local governmental units and agencies of this state shall cooperate with the department of environmental management in the administration and enforcement of this chapter. The intent of this chapter is to add to and to coordinate existing recycling hard-to-dispose material control and removal efforts, and to aid private and public efforts in the proper disposal, recycling, reuse, and reduction of hard-to-dispose material and not terminate or supplant those efforts.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 514, § 1.

37-15.1-3.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter the following terms shall, where the context permits, be construed as follows:

“Community recycling center” means a central collection point in a community for hard-to-dispose material, or a point where those materials are taken after being collected to be processed.

“Department” means the department of environmental management.

“Director” means the director of the department of environmental management.

“Hard-to-dispose of material” means and encompasses the following materials: petroleum-based or synthetic lubricating oils, including, but not limited to, lubricants in internal combustion engines; tires used on motorized vehicles and trailers, including cars, trucks, buses, and heavy construction equipment; glycol-based antifreeze and organic solvents. A petroleum-based or synthetic lubricating oil which is recycled and/or re-refined is not, nor shall it be considered, a hard-to-dispose material.

“Organic solvents” means any compounds of carbon which are liquids at standard conditions, and which are used as dissolvers, viscosity reducers, dilutents, thinners, reagents, or cleaning agents, (excluding carbon monoxide, carbon dioxide, carbonic acid, metallic carbides, metallic carbonates, and ammonium carbonate) and which are listed as hazardous waste pursuant to the state hazardous waste program pursuant to chapter 19.1, title 23.

“Person” means any natural person, political subdivision, government agency, public or private corporation, partnership, joint venture, association, firm, individual proprietorship, or other entity whatsoever.

“Program” means those activities of the department to encourage, manage, and fund hard-to-dispose material control and recycling, and to aid in the monitoring and tracking, reduction, recycling, and reuse of hard-to-dispose material control and recycling pursuant to this chapter.

“Public place” means any area that is used or held out for use by the public whether owned or operated by public or private interests.

“Recycling” means the reuse of recovered resources in manufacturing, agriculture, power production, or other processes.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 514, § 1.

37-15.1-4.
Prohibitions.

No person shall throw, drop, deposit, discard, or otherwise dispose of hard-to-dispose material upon any public property in the state or in the waters of this state or upon private property in this state owned by him or her except:

When the property is designated by the state or by any of its agencies or political subdivisions for the disposal of hard-to-dispose material, and that person is authorized to use the property for that purpose; or

Into a receptacle which has been provided by or authorized by the department.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 514, § 1.

37-15.1-5.
Revenue.

All assessments, fines, bail forfeitures, and other funds collected or received pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited as general revenues.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 514, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 115.

37-15.1-6.
Allocation of funds.

The department shall allocate and distribute money for the hard-to-dispose material program by way of grant to eligible persons for the following activities:

Establishing educational programs and technical assistance programs to assist in the collection, marketing, recycling, reuse, reduction, and safe disposal of hazardous material hard-to-dispose material.

Establishing a grant-in-aid program and research programs to assist in the collection, marketing, recycling, reuse, reduction, and proper disposal of hard-to-dispose material for both the public and private sectors.

Surveying, tracking, and monitoring hard-to-dispose material.

Establish or plan state owned and operated regional collection centers for hard-to-dispose material with priority given to household materials.

To supplement, not supplant, funds for the collection of used oil in the state’s collection system.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 514, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 115.

37-15.1-7.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 514, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 170, effective July 1, 1995.

37-15.1-8.
Application procedure.

A person eligible to receive a grant, loan, or contract under this chapter, and the department’s regulations adopted pursuant thereto, may make an application for the loan, grant, or contract in such form as may be required by the department.

The department shall grant or loan funds, and contract for services from the hard-to-dispose material account to eligible persons who have submitted an application for funds upon determining that the plan submitted by that person is qualified and suitable for purposes of the program.

The department shall require periodic reports to be filed by grant recipients. The department shall review, evaluate, and follow up on any actions taken by grant recipients to ensure that the purposes of this chapter are being achieved.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 514, § 1.

37-15.1-9.
Duties of the department.

In addition to the foregoing, the department shall:

Serve as the coordinating agency between the various industry organizations seeking to aid in the hard-to-dispose material and recycling efforts;

Recommend to the governing bodies of all local governments that they adopt ordinances consistent with the provisions of this chapter;

Cooperate with all local governments to accomplish coordination of local hard-to-dispose material and recycling efforts;

Encourage, organize, and coordinate all voluntary local hard-to-dispose material and recycling campaigns seeking to focus the attention of the public on the programs of this state to control and remove hard-to-dispose material, and to foster recycling;

Investigate the availability of, and apply for funds available from any private or public source to be used in the program outlined in this chapter;

Develop statewide programs to increase public awareness of and participation in recycling, and to encourage community recycling centers, public participation in recycling and research and development in the field of hard-to-dispose material, and recycling, removal, and disposal of litter-related recycling materials;

Publish a timetable for the establishment of the state owned and operated regional collection centers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 514, § 1.

37-15.1-10.
Cooperation between industry and department.

To aid in the state hard-to-dispose material and recycling campaign, the general assembly requests that the various industry organizations which are active in hard-to-dispose material and recycling efforts provide active cooperation with the department so that the additional effect may be given to the hard-to-dispose material and recycling campaign of the state of Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 514, § 1.

37-15.1-11.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the chapter or the application of the provisions to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 514, § 1.